Hawaii statutes.
§501-174 Power of attorney; registration
necessary. Any person may by attorney procure land to be registered and
convey or otherwise deal with registered land, but the letters of attorney
shall be acknowledged and filed or recorded with the assistant registrar and
registered. Any instrument revoking such letters shall be acknowledged and
registered in like manner. [L 1903, c 56, §104; RL 1925, §3294; RL 1935, §5092;
RL 1945, §12692; RL 1955, §342-92; HRS §501-174; am L 1986, c 246, §24]

Rules of Court

Power of attorney, see RLC rule 64.

Case Notes

Referred to: 50 H. 189, 436 P.2d 207.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next